Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.100

Violations—Civil penalties.

Any person, group, or entity or any owner, officer, agent, or employee of such entity who willfully violates any provision of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars for each violation. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. The fine may be imposed by the council or by any court of competent jurisdiction.

[ 2012 c 229 s 551; 1986 c 136 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.